Utah, session 2026, SB286.
Section 1. Section 58-86-102 is amended to read:58-86-102. Definitions.In addition to the definitions in Section 58-1-102, asAs used in this chapter:(1)"Building" means an enclosed structure, including the structural, mechanical, and electrical systems, utility services, and other facilities required for the structurethe structure requires, that has human occupancy or habitation as itsthe structure's principal purpose and is subject to the State Construction Code or an approved code under Title 15A, State Construction and Fire Codes Act.(2)"International Building Code" means the edition of the International Building Code, issued by the International Code Council, most recently adopted by the state in Section 15A-2-103.(3)(a)"Practice of commercial interior design" means, in relation to obtaining a building permit independent of an architect licensed under Title 58, Chapter 3a, Architects Licensing Act, the preparation of a plan or specification for, or the supervision of new construction, alteration, or repair of, an interior space within a newly constructed or existing building when the core and shell structural elements are not going to be changed.(b)"Practice of commercial interior design" only includes the preparation of a plan or specification for, or the supervision of new construction, alteration, or repair of, a building to be used for the following occupancy groups as described in the International Building Code:for any occupancy classification in the International Building Code if the work is limited to non-structural, non-seismic, and non-load-bearing interior elements in accordance with this section.(i)B; and(ii)M.(c)"Practice of commercial interior design" does not include:(i)providing commercial construction documents, independent of a licensed architect, for a space that:(A)does not already haveis lacking base building life safety components installed or designed and permitted, including required exit stairs and enclosures, paths of travel, ramps, horizontal exit passageways, disabled access, fire alarm systems, and base building fire suppression systems; or(B)is undergoing a change of occupancy classification as described in the International Building Codewhen a licensed architect or a licensed engineer is required in accordance with the International Building Code; or(ii)making changes to or thean addition of:(A)foundations, beams, trusses, columns, or other primary structural framing members or seismic systemsa foundation, a beam, a truss, a column, or other primary structural framing member or seismic system;(B)structural concrete slabs, floor and roof framing structures, or bearing and shear wallsa structural concrete slab, a floor or roof framing structure, or a bearing or shear wall;(C)openings in roofs, floors, exterior walls, or bearing and shear wallsan opening in the roof, a floor, an exterior wall, a bearing or shear wall;(D)exterior doors, windows, awnings, canopies, sunshades, signage, or similar exterior building elementsan exterior door, a window, an awning, a canopy, a sunshade, signage, or a similar exterior building element;(E)as described in the International Building Code, life safety equipment, including a smoke, fire, or a carbon dioxide sensors or detectors, or other overhead building elements;sensor or detector, or an overhead building element; or(F)as described in the International Building Code, partial height partitions with mounted or anchored casework, shelving, or equipment;(G)as described in the International Building Code, bracing for partial height partitions if the top of the partition is more than eight feet above the floor; or(H)(F)a piece of heating, ventilating, or air conditioning equipment or distribution systems,a heating, ventilating, or air conditioning distribution system, a building management systems,system, a high or medium voltage electrical distribution systems,system, a standby or emergency power systems or distribution systems, plumbing or plumbing distribution systems,system, plumbing, a fire alarm systems, fire sprinklers systems,system, a fire sprinkler system, a security or monitoring systems, orsystem, or a related building systemssystem.(4)"State certification" means a designation granted by the divisionthe division grants on behalf of the state to an individual who has metmeets the requirements for state certification related tofor an occupation or profession described in this chapter describes.(5)"State certified" means, when used in conjunction with an occupation or profession described in this chapter, a title that:(a)may be used by a person who has met the state certification requirements related to that occupation or profession described in this chapter; and(b)may not be used by a person who has not met the state certification requirements related to that occupation or profession described in this chapter.(6)(5)"Unlawful conduct" means the same as that term is defined in Sections 58-1-501 and 58-86-301.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 58-86-301 is amended to read:58-86-301. Unlawful conduct."Unlawful conduct" includes:(1)(a)using the title "state certified commercial interior designer" if the person is not a state certified commercial interior designer in good standing under this chapter; orusing the title state certified commercial interior designer, or representing that the individual is a state certified commercial interior designer if the individual is not a state certified commercial interior designer; or(b)using any other name, title, or initials that would cause a reasonable person to believe the person is licensed under this chapter if the person is not properly licensed under this chapter; or(2)engaging in the practice of commercial interior design unless exempted from licensure or state certification under Section 58-1-307 or 58-86-206.

Section 3:
Section 3.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.